Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.025

Disarming a law enforcement or corrections officer—Commission of another crime.

A person who commits another crime during the commission of the crime of disarming a law enforcement or corrections officer may be punished for the other crime as well as for disarming a law enforcement officer and may be prosecuted separately for each crime.

[ 1998 c 252 s 2.]